District of Columbia statutes.
46-355.04

Immunity from civil liability.

An employer that complies with an income-withholding order issued in another state in accordance with this subchapter is not subject to civil liability to an individual or agency with regard to the employer’s withholding of child support from the obligor’s income.

History

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 504, 63 DCR 222